Arkansas, session 2025, HB1773.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-9-405 is amended to read as follows:
7-9-405. Contributions and expenditures limited.
(a) No ballot question committee or legislative question committee
shall accept any contribution in cash, meaning currency or coin, that exceeds
one hundred dollars ($100).
(b)(a) No A ballot question committee or legislative question
committee shall not accept any contribution from a:
(1) prohibited Prohibited political action committee as defined
in § 7-6-201; or
(2) Foreign individual or entity.
(c) No ballot question committee, legislative question committee, or
individual shall make an expenditure in cash that exceeds fifty dollars
($50.00) to influence the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat
of a ballot question or the passage or defeat of a legislative question.
(d)(b) No contributions shall be made, directly or indirectly, by any
person in a name other than the name by which the person is identified for
*SSS198*
03/12/2025 8:04:14 AM SSS198

HB1773
legal purposes.
(e)(1) No person shall make an anonymous contribution totaling fifty
dollars ($50.00) or more to a ballot question committee or legislative
question committee.
(2) Any such anonymous contribution actually received by any
ballot question committee or legislative question committee shall be promptly
paid by the recipient to the Arkansas Ethics Commission for deposit into the
State Treasury as general revenues.
(c)(1)(A) It shall be unlawful for a ballot question committee,
legislative question committee, or for a person acting on the ballot question
committee's or the legislative question committee's behalf to accept
contributions in excess of the maximum contribution level established by rule
of the Arkansas Ethics Commission under subsection (e) of this section per
election from:
(i) An individual;
(ii) A political party that meets the definition of
a political party under § 7-1-101;
(iii) A political party that meets the requirements
of § 7-7-205;
(iv) A county political party committee;
(v) A legislative caucus committee; or
(vi) An approved political action committee.
(B) It shall be unlawful for a ballot question committee,
legislative question committee, or for a person acting on the ballot question
committee's or the legislative question committee's behalf to accept a
contribution from a prospective contributor other than those under
subdivisions (c)(1)(A)(i)-(vi) of this section.
(2) A ballot question committee or legislative question
committee may accept a contribution or contributions up to the maximum amount
from any prospective contributor under subdivisions (c)(1)(A)(i)-(vi) of this
section for each election, whether opposed or unopposed.
(d)(1)(A) It shall be unlawful for a person to make a contribution to
a ballot question committee, legislative question committee, or to a person
acting on the ballot question committee's or the legislative question
committee's behalf, which in the aggregate amount exceeds the maximum
contribution limit established by rule of the commission per election.
03/12/2025 8:04:14 AM SSS198

HB1773
(B) The total aggregate amount per election is based on
the total contributions made to a ballot question committee or legislative
question committee by a donor during an election regardless of which ballot
question the ballot question committee or legislative question committee is
advocating for or against, and the aggregate amount during an election
applies even if a ballot question committee or legislative question
committee:
(i) Advocates for or against more than one (1)
ballot question during the election; or
(ii) Concludes a campaign or otherwise withdraws the
ballot question.
(2) A person permitted to make a contribution or contributions
under subdivisions (c)(1)(A)(i)-(vi) of this section may make a contribution
or contributions up to the maximum amount to a ballot question committee or
legislative question committee for each election, whether opposed or
unopposed.
(e)(1) The commission shall establish the contribution limit under
this section by rule in the same manner provided for the establishment of the
maximum campaign contribution limit under § 7-6-203.
(2) The commission shall promulgate rules identifying the
adjusted contribution limit under this section.















03/12/2025 8:04:14 AM SSS198